North Carolina, session 2025, SB169.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-153.5(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(17) The amount paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year as labor organization
membership dues. For purposes of this subdivision, "labor organization
membership dues" are dues, fees, assessments, or other monies required as a
condition of membership or participation in a labor organization, as defined
in G.S. 168A-3."
SECTION 2. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2026.
*S169-v-1*